Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.133

State capital improvement or construction projects—Product standards.

(1) The state's preferences for the purchase and use of recycled content products shall be included as a factor in the design and development of state capital improvement projects.

(2) If a construction project receives state public funding, the product standards, as provided in RCW 43.19A.020, shall apply to the materials used in the project, whenever the administering agency and project owner determine that such products would be cost-effective and are readily available.

(3) This section does not apply to contracts entered into by a municipality.

[ 2002 c 299 s 2; 1996 c 198 s 5.]